Utah statutes.
75-2-710.   Worthier-title doctrine abolished.

The doctrine of worthier title is abolished as a rule of law and as a rule of construction.  Language in a governing instrument describing the beneficiaries of a disposition as the transferor's "heirs," "heirs-at-law," "next-of-kin," "distributees," "relatives," or "family," or language of similar import, does not create or presumptively create a reversionary interest in the transferor.



Enacted by Chapter 39, 1998 General Session

